Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.175

Board—Duties and responsibilities—Rules.

The board shall have the following duties and responsibilities under this chapter:

(1) To be responsible for the preparation, conducting, and grading of examinations of applicants for funeral director and embalmer licenses;

(2) To certify to the director the results of examinations of applicants and certify the applicant as having "passed" or "failed";

(3) To make findings and recommendations to the director on any and all matters relating to the enforcement of this chapter;

(4) To adopt and enforce reasonable rules;

(5) To examine or audit or to direct the examination and audit of prearrangement funeral service trust fund records for compliance with this chapter and rules adopted by the board; and

(6) To adopt rules establishing mandatory continuing education requirements to be met by persons applying for license renewal.

[ 2009 c 102 s 3; 2005 c 365 s 14; 1996 c 217 s 6; 1994 c 17 s 1. Prior: 1986 c 259 s 64; 1985 c 402 s 6; 1984 c 287 s 34; 1984 c 279 s 53; 1981 c 43 s 11; 1977 ex.s. c 93 s 9.]

NOTES:

Funeral directors and embalmers account and cemetery account abolished, moneys transferred to funeral and cemetery account—2009 c 102: See note following RCW 18.39.810.

Savings—1986 c 259 ss 64, 73: "The repeal of RCW 18.39.179 and the amendment of RCW 18.39.175 by this act shall not be construed as affecting any rights and duties which matured, penalties which were incurred, and proceedings which were begun before June 11, 1986." [ 1986 c 259 s 74.]

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Legislative finding—1985 c 402: See note following RCW 68.50.185.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.